South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3912.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-18-350 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D)(1) An individual responsible for reviewing or revising the state standards and assessments provided in subsection (A) shall not have a record of endorsing divisive concepts in classroom instruction, including the promotion of theoretical perspectives, frameworks, and worldviews that are disproportionately critical of society, culture, and our nation's history as being factual. (2) An individual responsible for reviewing or revising the state social studies standards and assessments as provided for in subsection (A) shall certify that they do not have a record of supporting narratives which characterize the founding of the United States, its evolution to a constitutional republic, or the history of the United States in general, as a story of oppression. (3) A majority of the State Board of Education designees responsible for reviewing and revising the state social studies standards and assessments must be subject matter historians, including constitutional history experts and military historians. For the purposes of this subsection, "historian" means a person with a doctorate in United States History or a subject matter expert including a published author of a literary work regarding a historically significant person, time period, or event. This subsection does not apply to the task force review established in subsection (A). (4) Any future revisions to the state social studies standards shall be content based, emphasizing the importance of leading individuals and key events in shaping the political, constitutional, intellectual, economic, diplomatic, and military history of the United States. (5) The State Superintendent of Education, according to her discretion, shall certify that all proposed appointees meet the foregoing qualifications and may remove any individual if a violation of this section is discovered at any point in the standards and assessment review process. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----